src/scripts/Albanian/macedonian.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define g2gMacedonian  [А|а]:a | [Е|È|Ѐ|е|è|ѐ]:e | [И|Ѝ|и|ѝ]:i | [О|о]:o |  [У|у]:u |
[Б|б]:b | [В|в]:v | [Г|г]:g | [Д|д]:d | [Ѓ|ѓ]:{gj} | [Ж|ж]:{zh} | [З|з]:z | [Ѕ|ѕ]:{dz} | [Ј|ј]:j | [К|к]:k | [Л|л]:{ll} | [Љ|љ]:{l} | [М|м]:m  | [Н|н]:n | [Њ|њ]:{nj} | [П|п]:p | [Р|р]:r | [С|с]:s | [Т|т]:t | [Ќ|ќ]:q | [Ф|ф]:f | [Х|х]:h | [Ц|ц]:c | [Ч|ч]:ç | [Џ|џ]:{xh} | [Ш|ш]:{sh} |  [CH|ch]:ç | [KJ|kj]:q | [DZ|dz]:x | [DZH|dzh]:{xh} | [Ǵ|ǵ]:{gj}| [Đ|đ]:{gj}| [Ḱ|ḱ]:q | [Ć|ć]:ç | [Ẑ|ẑ]:x | [Ž|ž]: {zh}| [Ń|ń]:{nj} | [N̂|n̂]:{nj} | [L̂|l̂]:{lj} | [Š|š]:{sh} | [Č|č]:ç | [Ĺ|ĺ]:{lj};

define MacVowel А|а|Е|È|Ѐ|е|è|ѐ|И|Ѝ|и|ѝ|О|о|У|у; 

define StressMark %`;
define g2gMacStress 
  [MacVowel -> StressMark ... || _ [\MacVowel]* MacVowel [\MacVowel]* MacVowel [\MacVowel]* .#.  ] .o. 
  [MacVowel -> StressMark ... || .#. [\StressMark]* _ [\StressMark]* MacVowel [\StressMark]* .#.  ] .o.
	[g2gMacedonian -> || _ ];
	  
define MacUCConsonant  Б|В|Г|Д|Ѓ|Ж|З|Ѕ|Ј|К|Л|Љ|М|Н|Њ|П|Р|С|Т|Ќ|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Џ|Ш ; 
define MacGrapheme g2gMacedonian.u; 

define MacSpell [А|а]:[cirilike a] | 
[Б|б]:[cirilike bë] | 
[В|в]:[cirilike vë] | 
[Г|г]:[cirilike gë] | 
[Д|д]:[cirilike dë] | 
[Ѓ|ѓ]:[cirilike gjë] | 
[Е|е]:[cirilike e] | 
[ѐ|Ѐ]:[cirilike e co nadreden znak] | 
[Ж|ж]:[cirilike zhë] | 
[З|з]:[cirilike zë] | 
[Ѕ|ѕ]:[cirilike xë] | 
[И|и]:[cirilike i ] | 
[Ѝ|ѝ]:[cirilike i co nadreden znak] | 
[Ј|ј]:[cirilike jë] | 
[К|к]:[cirilike kë] | 
[Л|л]:[cirilike lë] | 
[Љ|љ]:[cirilike ljë] | 
[М|м]:[cirilike më] | 
[Н|н]:[cirilike në] | 
[Њ|њ]:[cirilike një] | 
[О|о]:[cirilike o] | 
[П|п]:[cirilike pë] | 
[Р|р]:[cirilike rë] | 
[С|с]:[cirilike së] | 
[Т|т]:[cirilike të] | 
[Ќ|ќ]:[cirilike kjë] | 
[У|у]:[cirilike u] | 
[Ф|ф]:[cirilike fë] | 
[Х|х]:[cirilike hë] | 
[Ц|ц]:[cirilike cë] | 
[Ч|ч]:[cirilike çë] | 
[Џ|џ]:[cirilike xhë] | 
[Ш|ш]:[cirilike shë] | 
[È|è] : [%`e so nadreden znak] | 
[Ì|ì] : [%`i so nadreden znak] | 
[Ǵ|ǵ]: [shkronja maqedonase gjë] |
[Đ|đ]: [shkronja maqedonase gjë] |
[Ḱ|ḱ] : [shkronja maqedonase kjë] |
[Ć|ć] : [shkronja maqedonase kjë] |
[Ẑ|ẑ] : [shkronja maqedonase xë] | 
[Ž|ž]: [shkronja maqedonase zhë] | 
[Ń|ń|N̂|n̂]: [shkronja maqedonase një] |
[Š|š]: [shkronja maqedonase shë] | 
[Č|č]: [shkronja maqedonase çë] | 
[Ĺ|ĺ|L̂|l̂]: [shkronja maqedonase ljë] ;
